Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 1. Offenses Related to Alcohol, Inhalants, and Controlled Substances; Implied Consent.

Administrative Code. —

For forensic alcohol testing, see 13 AAC 63.

Sec. 28.35.010.
Driving a vehicle without owner’s consent. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For current law, see AS 11.46.360.]

Sec. 28.35.015.
[Renumbered as AS 28.35.300.]

Sec. 28.35.020.
Conviction in larceny prosecution. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.35.024.
[Renumbered as AS 28.35.310.]

Sec. 28.35.025.
Obtaining rental vehicle with intent to defraud. [Repealed, §
25 ch 144 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 28.35.026.
[Renumbered as AS 28.35.320.]

Sec. 28.35.028.
Court-ordered treatment.

Notwithstanding another provision of law, with the consent of the state and the defendant, the court may elect to proceed in a criminal case under AS

04.16.200(b)

or (e), AS

28.35.030

, or

28.35.032

, including the case of a defendant charged with violating the terms of probation, under the procedure provided in this section and order the defendant to complete a court-ordered treatment program. The state may not consent to a referral under this subsection unless the state has consulted with the victim and explained the process and consequences of the referral to the victim. A court may not elect to proceed under this section if the defendant has previously participated in a court-ordered treatment program under this section two or more times.

Once the court elects to proceed under this section, the defendant shall enter a no contest or guilty plea to the offense or shall admit to a probation violation, as appropriate. The state and the defendant may enter into a plea agreement to determine the offense or offenses to which the defendant is required to plead. If the court accepts the agreement, the court shall enforce the terms of the agreement. The court shall enter a judgment of conviction for the offense or offenses for which the defendant has pleaded or an order finding that the defendant has violated probation, as appropriate. A judgment of conviction or an order finding a probation violation must set a schedule for payment of restitution owed by the defendant. In a judgment of conviction and on probation conditions that the court considers appropriate, the court may withhold pronouncement of a period of imprisonment or a fine to provide an incentive for the defendant to complete recommended treatment successfully. Imprisonment or a fine imposed by a court shall comply with AS 12.55 or any mandatory minimum or other sentencing provision applicable to the offense. However, notwithstanding Rule 35, Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure, and any other provision of law, the court, at any time after the period when a reduction of sentence is normally available, may consider and reduce the defendant’s sentence, including imprisonment, fine, or license revocation, based on the defendant’s compliance with the treatment plan; when reducing a sentence, the court (1) may not reduce the sentence below the mandatory minimum sentence for the offense unless the court finds that the defendant has successfully complied with and completed the treatment plan and that the treatment plan approximated the severity of the minimum period of imprisonment, and (2) may consider the defendant’s compliance with the treatment plan as a mitigating factor allowing a reduction of a sentence under AS

12.55.155(a)

. A court entering an order finding the defendant has violated probation may withhold pronouncement of disposition to provide an incentive for the defendant to complete the recommended treatment successfully.

If the defendant does not successfully complete the treatment plan imposed by the court under this section, the defendant’s no contest or guilty plea or admission to a probation violation to the court shall stand, and the sentence previously imposed shall be executed or, if sentence has not yet been imposed, sentence shall be imposed by the court.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the judge, the state, the defendant, and the agencies involved in the defendant’s treatment plan are entitled to information and reports bearing on the defendant’s assessment, treatment, and progress. The victim is entitled to periodic reports on the defendant’s progress and participation.

In addition to other conditions authorized under AS 12.30 or AS 12.55, a court may impose the following conditions of bail or probation:

require the defendant to submit to electronic monitoring;

require the defendant to submit to house arrest.

A court shall refer a defendant who is ordered to participate in a treatment program under this section to an alcohol safety action program developed and implemented or designated under AS

47.37.040

(21) for screening, referral, and monitoring.

In addition to other conditions authorized under AS 12.30, a court may require the defendant to take a drug or combination of drugs intended to prevent substance abuse.

In this section,

“court-ordered treatment program” or “treatment plan” means a treatment program for a person who consumes alcohol or drugs and that

requires participation for at least 18 consecutive months;

includes planning and treatment for alcohol or drug addiction;

includes emphasis on personal responsibility;

provides in-court recognition of progress and sanctions for relapses;

requires payment of restitution to victims and completion of community work service;

includes physician-approved treatment of physical addiction and treatment of the psychological causes of addiction;

includes a monitoring program and physical placement or housing; and

requires adherence to conditions of probation;

“sentence” or “sentencing” includes a suspended imposition of sentence as authorized under AS

12.55.085

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 56 SLA 2006; am § 31 ch 75 SLA 2008; am § 106 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For effect of (b) of this section on Rule 35, Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure, see § 8, ch. 56, SLA 2006.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, inserted “, including imprisonment, fine, or license revocation,” preceding “based on the defendant’s compliance” in the eighth sentence in (b).

Sec. 28.35.029.
Open container.

A person may not drive a motor vehicle on a highway or vehicular way or area, when there is an open bottle, can, or other receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage in the passenger compartment of the vehicle, except as provided in (b) of this section.

Except as provided in AS

28.33.130

, a person may transport an open bottle, can, or other receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage

in the trunk of a motor vehicle;

on a motor driven cycle, or behind the last upright seat in a motor home, station wagon, hatchback, or similar trunkless vehicle, if the open bottle, can, or other receptacle is enclosed within another container;

behind a solid partition that separates the vehicle driver from the area normally occupied by passengers; or

if the open bottle, can, or other receptacle is in the possession of a passenger in a motor vehicle for which the owner receives direct monetary compensation and that has a capacity of 12 or more persons.

In this section

“alcoholic beverage” has the meaning given in AS

04.21.080(b)

;

[Repealed, § 29 ch 3 SLA 1992.]

“motor vehicle” means a vehicle for which a driver’s license is required;

“open” includes having a broken seal;

“passenger compartment” means the area normally occupied by the driver and passengers and includes a utility or glove compartment accessible to the driver or a passenger while the motor vehicle is being operated.

A person who violates (a) of this section is guilty of an infraction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 142 SLA 1988; am §§ 21, 29 ch 3 SLA 1992)

Sec. 28.35.030.
Operating a vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance.

A person commits the crime of driving while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance if the person operates or drives a motor vehicle or operates an aircraft or a watercraft

while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, intoxicating liquor, inhalant, or any controlled substance, singly or in combination; or

and if, as determined by a chemical test taken within four hours after the alleged operating or driving, there is 0.08 percent or more by weight of alcohol in the person’s blood or 80 milligrams or more of alcohol per 100 milliliters of blood, or if there is 0.08 grams or more of alcohol per 210 liters of the person’s breath.

Except as provided under (n) of this section, driving while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance is a class A misdemeanor. Upon conviction,

the court shall impose a minimum sentence of imprisonment of

not less than 72 consecutive hours, require the person to use an ignition interlock device after the person regains the privilege, including any limited privilege, to operate a motor vehicle for a minimum of six months, and impose a fine of not less than $1,500 if the person has not been previously convicted;

not less than 20 days, require the person to use an ignition interlock device after the person regains the privilege, including any limited privilege, to operate a motor vehicle for a minimum of 12 months, and impose a fine of not less than $3,000 if the person has been previously convicted once;

not less than 60 days, require the person to use an ignition interlock device after the person regains the privilege, including any limited privilege, to operate a motor vehicle for a minimum of 18 months, and impose a fine of not less than $4,000 if the person has been previously convicted twice and is not subject to punishment under (n) of this section;

not less than 120 days, require the person to use an ignition interlock device after the person regains the privilege, including any limited privilege, to operate a motor vehicle for a minimum of 24 months, and impose a fine of not less than $5,000 if the person has been previously convicted three times and is not subject to punishment under (n) of this section;

not less than 240 days, require the person to use an ignition interlock device after the person regains the privilege, including any limited privilege, to operate a motor vehicle for a minimum of 30 months, and impose a fine of not less than $6,000 if the person has been previously convicted four times and is not subject to punishment under (n) of this section;

not less than 360 days, require the person to use an ignition interlock device after the person regains the privilege, including any limited privilege, to operate a motor vehicle for a minimum of 36 months, and impose a fine of not less than $7,000 if the person has been previously convicted more than four times and is not subject to punishment under (n) of this section;

the court may not

suspend execution of sentence or grant probation except on condition that the person

serve the minimum imprisonment under (1) of this subsection;

pay the minimum fine required under (1) of this subsection;

suspend imposition of sentence; or

suspend the requirement for an ignition interlock device for a violation of (a)(1) of this section involving an alcoholic beverage or intoxicating liquor, singly or in combination, or a violation of (a)(2) of this section;

the court shall revoke the person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license under AS

28.15.181

, and may order that the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft that was used in commission of the offense be forfeited under AS

28.35.036

; and

the court may order that the person, while incarcerated or as a condition of probation or parole, take a drug or combination of drugs intended to prevent the consumption of an alcoholic beverage; a condition of probation or parole imposed under this paragraph is in addition to any other condition authorized under another provision of law.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 119 SLA 1990.]

Except as prohibited by federal law or regulation, every provider of treatment programs to which persons are ordered under this section shall supply the judge, prosecutor, defendant, and an agency involved in the defendant’s treatment with information and reports concerning the defendant’s past and present assessment, treatment, and progress. Information compiled under this subsection is confidential and may only be used in connection with court proceedings involving the defendant’s treatment, including use by a court in sentencing a person convicted under this section, or by an officer of the court in preparing a presentence report for the use of the court in sentencing a person convicted under this section.

A person who is sentenced to imprisonment for 72 consecutive hours upon a first conviction under this section and who is not released from imprisonment after 72 hours may not bring an action against the state or a municipality or its agents, officers, or employees for damages resulting from the additional period of confinement if

the employee or employees who released the person exercised due care and, in releasing the person, followed the standard release procedures of the prison facility; and

the additional period of confinement did not exceed 12 hours.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 119 SLA 1990.]

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, the court may reduce the fine required to be imposed under (b) of this section by the cost of the ignition interlock device.

The court shall order a person convicted under this section to satisfy the screening, evaluation, referral, and program requirements of an alcohol safety action program if such a program is available in the community where the person resides, or a private or public treatment facility approved by the Department of Health and Social Services, under AS 47.37 to make referrals for rehabilitative treatment or to provide rehabilitative treatment. If a person is convicted under (n) of this section, the court shall order the person to be evaluated as required by this subsection before the court imposes sentence for the offense.

A program of inpatient treatment may be required by the authorized agency under (h) of this section only if authorized in the judgment, and may not exceed the maximum term of inpatient treatment specified in the judgment. A person who has been referred for inpatient treatment under this subsection may make a written request to the sentencing court asking the court to review the referral. The request for review shall be made within seven days of the agency’s referral, and shall specifically set out the grounds upon which the request for review is based. The court may order a hearing on the request for review.

If a person fails to satisfy the requirements of an authorized agency under (i) of this section, the court

may impose any portion of a suspended sentence; however, if the person was convicted under (n) of this section, the court shall impose a part or all of the remaining portion of any suspended sentence;

may punish the failure as contempt of the authority of the court under AS

09.50.010

or as a violation of a condition of probation; and

shall order the revocation or suspension of the person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, and privilege to obtain a driver’s license until the requirements are satisfied.

Imprisonment required under (b)(1)(A) of this section shall be served at a community residential center or by electronic monitoring at a private residence under AS

33.30.065

. If a community residential center or electronic monitoring at a private residence is not available, imprisonment required under (b)(1)(A) of this section may be served at another appropriate place determined by the commissioner of corrections. Imprisonment required under (b)(1)(B) — (F) of this section may be served at a community residential center or at a private residence if approved by the commissioner of corrections. Imprisonment served at a private residence must include electronic monitoring under AS

33.30.065

. The cost of imprisonment resulting from the sentence imposed under (b)(1) of this section shall be paid to the state by the person being sentenced. The cost of imprisonment required to be paid under this subsection may not exceed $2,000. Upon the person’s conviction, the court shall include the costs of imprisonment as a part of the judgment of conviction. Except for reimbursement from a permanent fund dividend as provided in this subsection, payment of the cost of imprisonment is not required if the court determines the person is indigent. For costs of imprisonment that are not paid by the person as required by this subsection, the state shall seek reimbursement from the person’s permanent fund dividend as provided under AS

43.23.140

. A person sentenced under (b)(1)(B) of this section shall perform at least 160 hours of community service work, as required by the director of the community residential center or other appropriate place, or as required by the commissioner of corrections if the sentence is being served at a private residence. In this subsection, “appropriate place” means a facility with 24-hour on-site staff supervision that is specifically adapted to provide a residence, and includes a correctional center, residential treatment facility, hospital, halfway house, group home, work farm, work camp, or other place that provides varying levels of restriction.

The commissioner of corrections shall determine and prescribe by regulation a uniform average cost of imprisonment for the purpose of determining the cost of imprisonment required to be paid under (k) of this section by a convicted person. The regulations must include the costs associated with electronic monitoring under AS

33.30.065

.

If the act for which a person is convicted under this section contributes to a motor vehicle accident, the court shall order the person to pay the reasonable cost of any emergency services that responded to the accident, if the convicted person or the convicted person’s insurer has not already paid the cost of the emergency services. If payment is required under this subsection, the payment shall be made directly to the emergency service and shall be equal to the actual cost of responding to the accident or the previous year’s annual average cost of responding to a motor vehicle accident, whichever is higher. In this subsection, “emergency service” includes a peace officer, fire department, ambulance service, emergency medical technician, or emergency trauma technician.

A person is guilty of a class C felony if the person is convicted under (a) of this section and either has been previously convicted two or more times since January 1, 1996, and within the 10 years preceding the date of the present offense, or punishment under this subsection or under AS

28.35.032(p)

was previously imposed within the last 10 years. For purposes of determining minimum sentences based on previous convictions, the provisions of (w)(4) of this section apply. Upon conviction, the court

shall impose a fine of not less than $10,000, require the person to use an ignition interlock device after the person regains the privilege to operate a motor vehicle for a minimum of 60 months, and impose a minimum sentence of imprisonment of not less than

120 days if the person has been previously convicted twice;

240 days if the person has been previously convicted three times;

360 days if the person has been previously convicted four or more times;

may not

suspend execution of sentence or grant probation except on condition that the person

serve the minimum imprisonment under (1) of this subsection;

pay the minimum fine required under (1) of this subsection;

suspend imposition of sentence; or

suspend the requirement for an ignition interlock device for a violation of (a)(1) of this section involving an alcoholic beverage or intoxicating liquor, singly or in combination, or a violation of (a)(2) of this section;

shall permanently revoke the person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license subject to restoration of the license under (o) of this section;

may order that the person, while incarcerated or as a condition of probation or parole, take a drug or combination of drugs intended to prevent the consumption of an alcoholic beverage; a condition of probation or parole imposed under this paragraph is in addition to any other condition authorized under another provision of law;

shall order forfeiture under AS

28.35.036

of the vehicle, watercraft, or aircraft used in the commission of the offense, subject to remission under AS

28.35.037

; and

shall order the department to revoke the registration for any vehicle registered by the department in the name of the person convicted under this subsection; if a person convicted under this subsection is a registered co-owner of a vehicle or is registered as a co-owner under a business name, the department shall reissue the vehicle registration and omit the name of the person convicted under this subsection.

Upon request, the department shall review a driver’s license revocation imposed under (n)(3) of this section and, unless the revocation was ordered under (u) or (v) of this section or in a case in which the person was also convicted of a crime under AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.210

,

11.41.280

,

11.41.282

, or a similar law in another jurisdiction,

may restore the driver’s license if

the license has been revoked for a period of at least 10 years;

the person has not been convicted of a driving-related criminal offense or a felony in the 10 years preceding the request for restoration of the license; and

the person provides proof of financial responsibility;

shall restore the driver’s license if

the person has been granted limited license privileges under AS

28.15.201(g)

and has successfully driven under that limited license for three years without having the limited license privileges revoked;

the person has successfully completed a court-ordered treatment program under AS

28.35.028

or a rehabilitative treatment program under AS

28.15.201(h)

;

the person has not been convicted of a violation of AS

28.35.030

or

28.35.032

or a similar law or ordinance of this or another jurisdiction since the license was revoked;

the person is otherwise eligible to have the person’s driving privileges restored as provided in AS

28.15.211

; in an application under this subsection, a person whose license was revoked for a violation of AS

28.35.030(n)

or

28.35.032(p)

is not required to submit compliance as required under AS

28.35.030(h)

or

28.35.032(l)

; and

the person provides proof of financial responsibility.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 56 SLA 2006.]

For purposes of this section, the director of the division within the department responsible for administration of this section or a person designated by the director may request and receive criminal justice information available under AS 12.62. In this subsection, “criminal justice information” has the meaning given in AS

12.62.900

.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 85 SLA 2010.]

In a prosecution under (a) of this section, a person may introduce evidence on the amount of alcohol consumed before or after operating or driving the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft to rebut or explain the results of a chemical test, but the consumption of alcohol before operating or driving may not be used as a defense that the chemical test did not measure the blood alcohol at the time of the operating or driving. Consumption of alcohol after operating or driving the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft may be used to raise such a defense.

Notwithstanding (b) or (n) of this section, the court shall waive the requirement of the use of an ignition interlock device when a person operates a motor vehicle in a community included on the list published by the department under AS

28.22.011(b)

.

In addition to the penalties imposed under (n) of this section, if a person is convicted under (n) of this section and has been convicted two or more times under (n) of this section or a similar law of another jurisdiction at any time preceding the date of the present offense, upon conviction, the court shall permanently revoke the person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license.

In addition to the penalties imposed under (b) of this section, if a person is convicted under (a) of this section and the person has previously had the person’s driver’s license restored under (o) of this section or under AS

28.35.032(q)

, upon conviction, the court shall permanently revoke the person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license.

In this section,

“inhalant” has the meaning given to the phrase “hazardous volatile material or substance” in AS

47.37.270

;

“operate an aircraft” means to navigate, pilot, or taxi an aircraft in the airspace over this state, or upon the land or water inside this state;

“operate a watercraft” means to navigate a vessel used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water for recreational or commercial purposes on all waters, fresh or salt, inland or coastal, inside the territorial limits or under the jurisdiction of the state;

“previously convicted” means having been convicted in this or another jurisdiction within the 15 years preceding the date of the present offense of any of the following offenses; however, convictions for any of these offenses, if arising out of a single transaction and a single arrest, are considered one previous conviction:

operating a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft in violation of this section or in violation of another law or ordinance with similar elements, except that the other law or ordinance may provide for a lower level of alcohol in the person’s blood or breath than imposed under (a)(2) of this section;

refusal to submit to a chemical test in violation of AS

28.35.032

or in violation of another law or ordinance with similar elements; or

operating a commercial motor vehicle in violation of AS

28.33.030

or in violation of another law or ordinance with similar elements, except that the other law or ordinance may provide for a lower level of alcohol in the person’s blood or breath than imposed under AS

28.33.030

(a)(2).

History.

(§ 50-5-3 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 107 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 121 SLA 1967; am § 45 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 4 ch 74 SLA 1974; am §§ 2, 3 ch 152 SLA 1978; am § 28 ch 94 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 129 SLA 1980; am § 21 ch 45 SLA 1982; am §§ 13 — 15 ch 117 SLA 1982; am §§ 13 — 15 ch 77 SLA 1983; am §§ 4, 5 ch 57 SLA 1989; am §§ 23, 24, 34 ch 119 SLA 1990; am §§ 6, 7 ch 188 SLA 1990; am §§ 22, 23 ch 3 SLA 1992; am § 8 ch 59 SLA 1993; am § 17 ch 55 SLA 1994; am §§ 3 — 7 ch 80 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 87 SLA 1995; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 143 SLA 1996; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 63 SLA 2001; am §§ 27 — 33 ch 60 SLA 2002; am E.O. No. 108 § 2 (2003); am §§ 25 — 27 ch 124 SLA 2004; am §§ 4, 5 ch 126 SLA 2004; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 68 SLA 2005; am §§ 4, 7 ch 56 SLA 2006; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 97 SLA 2008; am §§ 3 — 6, 12 ch 85 SLA 2010; am § 27 ch 83 SLA 2014; am §§
107 — 109 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§
94 — 96 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (g) was enacted as (h); relettered in 1989. Subsections (h) — (j) were enacted as (i) — (k); relettered in 1990. Subsections (k) and (

l

) were enacted as (

l

) and (m); relettered in 1993. Subsection (m) was formerly (f); relettered as (g) in 1984, as (h) in 1989, as (k) in 1990, and as (m) in 1993. Changes in internal references throughout this section were made in 1990 to reflect the amendment of subsection (b), the repeal of subsection (c), and the relettering of subsections (h) — (k). Section 25,
ch. 119, SLA 1990 added subsections (h) — (j) identical to those added by
ch. 188, SLA 1990. Because ch. 188 took effect before ch. 119, the amendments by § 25, ch. 119 are not noted in the historical citation for this section. Subsection (m) was enacted as (n). Relettered in 1995, at which time former subsection (m) was relettered as subsection (o) [now (r)] and the internal reference to (o)(4) [now (w)(4)] in subsection (n) was changed to reflect the relettering. Subsections (o), (p), and (q) were enacted as (p), (q), and (r), respectively.
Relettered in 2002, at which time what was formerly subsection (o) was relettered as (r) [now (w)] and internal cross-references in subsections (b) and (n) were conformed to the relettering. Subsection (r) was enacted as (s) and relettered in 2004, at which time what was formerly subsection (r) was relettered as (t) [now (w)] and an internal reference in (n) was conformed to the relettering. Subsection (t) was enacted as (u) [now (w)] and relettered in 2008, at which time what was formerly subsection (t) was relettered as (u) [now (w)] and an internal reference in (n) was conformed to the relettering.

In 2018, “AS

43.23.140

” was substituted for “43.23.065” in subsection (o) to reflect the renumbering of that section. Subsections (u) and (v) were enacted as (v) and (w).

Relettered in 2019, at which time former (u) was relettered as (w) and the internal reference to (u)(4) in subsection (n) was changed to reflect the relettering.

Cross references. —

For maximum sentences and fines for a class A misdemeanor, see AS

12.55.035(b)(5)

and

12.55.135(a)

, respectively; for crime of operating a commercial motor vehicle while intoxicated, see AS

28.33.030

; for effect of the enactment of (k) on Alaska Rule of Criminal Procedure 32(b), see § 11, ch. 59, SLA 1993, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see secs. 185(d)(5) and (l)(4), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 16, 2014, in (k), in the first sentence, added “by electronic monitoring at a private residence” at the end, in the second sentence, substituted “If a community residential center or electronic monitoring at a private residence is not available, imprisonment required under (b)(1)(A) of this section may be served” for “, if a community residential center is not available,”.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, rewrote (k); in (

l

), added the last sentence; in (o), designated a portion of the subsection as (1), redesignated (o)(1), (2) and (3) as (o)(1)(A), (B) and (C), respectively, in (o)(1)(B), inserted “driving-related” preceding “criminal offense”, added (o)(2); and made a related change.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (k), inserted “at a community residential center or” in the first sentence, rewrote the second sentence, which read, “If electronic monitoring is not available, imprisonment required under (b)(1)(A) of this section shall be served at a private residence by other means determined by the commissioner of corrections.”, deleted the former third sentence, which read, “A person who is serving a sentence of imprisonment required under (b)(1)(A) of this section by electronic monitoring at a private residence may not be subject to a search of the person’s dwelling by a peace officer or a person required to administer the electronic monitoring under AS

33.30.065(a)

, except upon probable cause.”, and deleted “or, if electronic monitoring is not available, by other means as determined by the commissioner of corrections” at the end of the current third sentence; in (o), added “, unless the revocation was ordered under (v) or (w) of this section or in a case in which the person was also convicted of a crime under AS

11.41.100

–

11.41.210

,

11.41.280

,

11.41.282

, or a similar law in another jurisdiction,” and substituted “offense or a felony in the 10 years preceding the request for restoration of the license; and” for “offense since the license was revoked; and” in (o)(1)(B); and added (v) and (w) [now (u) and (v)].

Editor's notes. —

Section 18, ch. 63, SLA 2001, provides that the amendments to subsections (a), (n), and (o) (now (u)) made by ch. 63, SLA 2001 apply “to offenses committed on or after the effective date of the relevant section of this Act, except that references to previous convictions include convictions occurring before, on, or after the effective date of the relevant section of the Act.”
Under § 20, ch. 63, SLA 2001, the effective date of the amendment to subsection (a) was September 1, 2001.
Under § 21, ch. 63, SLA 2001, the effective date of the amendments to subsections (n) and (o) (now (u)) was July 4, 2001.

Section 57(b),
ch. 60, SLA 2002 provides that the amendments to subsections (a), (b), (d), (k), (n), and (r) [now (u)], made by §§ 27—32,
ch. 60, SLA 2002, and subsections (o), (p), and (q), added by § 33,
ch. 60, SLA 2002, apply “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2002, except that references to previous convictions include convictions occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2002.”

Section 7, ch. 126, SLA 2004, provides that the 2004 amendment of (t)(4) [now (u)(4)] of this section applies “to persons seeking limited licenses as a result of revocations for convictions occurring before, on, or after June 30, 2004.” The same section also provides that subsection (r), enacted as subsection (s) by § 5, ch. 126, SLA 2004, applies “only to acts committed on or after January 1, 2005.”

Section 32(a),
ch. 124, SLA 2004, provides that the 2004 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2004.”
Section 32(b),
ch. 124, SLA 2004, provides that the 2004 amendment of (n) of this section applies “to offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2004, except that previous punishment [, referred to in the subsection,] . . . includes punishment imposed before, on, or after July 1, 2004.”
Section 32(d),
ch. 124, SLA 2004, provides that (s) of this section applies “to criminal proceedings for offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2004.”

Under sec. 36(b), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (k) as amended by sec. 27, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to convictions occurring before, on, or after July 17, 2014 for offenses occurring before, on, or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(b),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment to (k) and the enactment of (v) and (w) [now (u) and (v)] of this section apply “to sentences imposed on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Section 142(i),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment to (o) of this section applies “to revocation of a driver's license occurring before, on, or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring before, on, or after July 9, 2019.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

The term “public street or highway” is sufficiently broad to include subdivision streets dedicated to the public. 1965 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.

The Department of Public Safety may enforce this section and AS

28.35.040

[now AS

28.35.400

] on subdivision roads under public use. 1965 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.